it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey > Ausili per l'allenamento di pattinaggio artistico e hockey > Tappetini da allenamento per pattinaggio artistico e hockey: Piastrelle per allenamento a secco e multisport; Piastrelle e pannelli in ghiaccio sintetico
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko > Taitoluistelun ja jääkiekon harjoitteluvälineet > Taitoluistelun ja jääkiekon harjoittelumatot: Kuivaharjoittelu- ja monilajilaatat; Synteettiset jäälaatat ja -paneelit
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập trượt băng nghệ thuật & khúc côn cầu > Thảm luyện tập trượt băng nghệ thuật & khúc côn cầu: Ô sàn tập đa năng và trên cạn; Tấm ván và ô sàn băng nhân tạo
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Tréningové pomôcky na krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Tréningové podložky na krasokorčuľovanie a hokej: Dlaždice na tréning v suchom prostredí a pre viaceré športy; Syntetické ľadové dlaždice a panely
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey > Artistik Patinaj ve Hokey Eğitim Araçları > Artistik Patinaj ve Hokey Antrenman Minderleri: Kara ve çoklu spor antrenman karoları; Sentetik buz karoları ve panelleri
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong edzési segédeszközök > Műkorcsolya- és jégkorong-edzőszőnyegek: Szárazföldi és multisport edzőlapok; Szintetikus jéglapok és panelek
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey > Treningshjelpemidler for kunstløp og hockey > Treningsmatter for kunstløp og hockey: Treningsfliser for barmark og multisport; Syntetiske ispaneler og -fliser
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey > Figure Skating & Hockey Training Aids > Figure Skating & Hockey Training Mats: Dryland & Multi-Sport Training Tiles; Synthetic Ice Tiles & Panels
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey > Benodigdheden voor kunstrijd- en ijshockeytraining > Matten voor kunstrijd- en ijshockeytraining: Trainingstegels voor droogtraining en multisport; Synthetische ijstegels en -panelen
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys > Dailiojo čiuožimo ir ledo ritulio treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės > Dailiojo čiuožimo ir ledo ritulio treniruočių kilimėliai: Sausumos ir kelių sportų treniruočių plytelės; Sintetinio ledo plytelės ir panelės
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey > Ayudas para el entrenamiento de hockey y patinaje artístico > Tapetes de entrenamiento para patinaje artístico y hockey: Baldosas de entrenamiento multideporte y en seco; Paneles y baldosas de hielo sintético
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > อุปกรณ์ช่วยในการฝึกสเก็ตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > เสื่อฝึกซ้อมสเก็ตลีลาและฮอกกี้: ไทล์ปูพื้นฝึกซ้อมบนบกและกีฬาอเนกประสงค์; ไทล์และแผงน้ำแข็งสังเคราะห์
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey > Eiskunstlauf- & Hockey-Trainingshilfen > Eiskunstlauf- & Hockey-Trainingsmatten: Trockentraining- & Multisport-Kacheln; Synthetikeis-Kacheln & Paneele
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Помощни средства за тренировка по фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Постелки за тренировка по фигурно пързаляне и хокей: Тренировъчни настилки и плочки за много спортове; Синтетични ледени плочки и панели
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei > Articole antrenament patinaj artistic și hochei > Covorașe de antrenament pentru patinaj artistic și hochei: Dale pentru antrenament uscat și multisport; Dale și panouri de gheață sintetică
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー練習器具 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用トレーニングマット: ドライランド・マルチスポーツ用トレーニングタイル; 合成アイスタイル・パネル
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey > Aides à l'entraînement pour le patinage artistique et le hockey > Tapis d'entraînement pour patinage artistique et hockey: Dalles d'entraînement multisports et hors glace; Dalles et panneaux de glace synthétique
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 훈련 장비 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 훈련 매트: 지상 및 멀티 스포츠 훈련 타일; 합성 아이스 타일 및 패널
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание > Тренировочный инвентарь для хоккея и фигурного катания > Коврики для тренировок по хоккею и фигурному катанию: Плиты для сухопутных и мультиспортивных тренировок; Плиты и панели из синтетического льда
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei > Auxílios de treinamento para patinação artística e hóquei > Tapetes de treinamento para patinação artística e hóquei: Placas de treinamento dryland e multiesportes; Placas e painéis de gelo sintético
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球訓練輔助工具 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球訓練護具: 陸地與綜合運動訓練地墊; 合成冰面地墊與面板
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej > Tréninkové pomůcky na krasobruslení a hokej > Tréninkové podložky pro krasobruslení a hokej: Dlaždice pro suchý a multisportovní trénink; Dlaždice a panely ze syntetického ledu
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey > Träningshjälpmedel för konståkning och hockey > Träningsmattor för konståkning och hockey: Träningsplattor för barmark och multisport; Plattor och paneler med syntetisk is
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej > Pripomočki za vadbo umetnostnega drsanja in hokeja > Vadbene podloge za umetnostno drsanje in hokej: Ploščice za treniranje na kopnem in za več športov; Ploščice in plošče iz sintetičnega ledu
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej > Pomoce treningowe do łyżwiarstwa figurowego i hokeja > Maty treningowe do łyżwiarstwa figurowego i hokeja: Wielofunkcyjne płytki do treningu na sucho; Płyty i panele z lodu syntetycznego
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Προπονητικά βοηθήματα πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Στρώματα προπόνησης πατινάζ & χόκεϊ: Πλακίδια ξηρής προπόνησης και πολλαπλών αθλημάτων; Συνθετικά πλακίδια και πάνελ πάγου
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística > Auxiliares de treino para patinagem artística e hóquei > Tapetes de treino para patinagem artística e hóquei: Mosaicos de treino multidesportivo e em terra seca; Mosaicos e painéis de gelo sintético
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej > Pomagala za vježbanje umjetničkog klizanja i hokeja > Podloge za umjetničko klizanje i hokej: Pločice za vježbanje na suhom i višenamjenskom terenu; Pločice i paneli od sintetičkog leda
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey > Hjælpemidler til kunstskøjteløb og hockey > Træningsmåtter til kunstskøjteløb og hockey: Træningsplader til dryland og multisport; Syntetiske isplader og -paneler
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球 > 花样滑冰/冰球训练辅助用品 > 花样滑冰/冰球训练垫: 陆地与多项运动训练地板; 仿真冰拼接块与冰板